Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-103
Department heads; salaries; powers of Governor.

The Governor shall have authority to establish the salaries of all persons connected with the various departments including the heads thereof.

Laws 1929, c. 51, § 3, p. 210;

C.S.1929, § 81-103;

Laws 1933, c. 149, § 3, p. 572;

Laws 1937, c. 194, § 1, p. 789;

Laws 1941, c. 181, § 1, p. 712;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-103;

Laws 1943, c. 212, § 1, p. 698;

R.S.1943, § 81-103;

Laws 1945, c. 223, § 1, p. 667;

Laws 1947, c. 309, § 1, p. 941;

Laws 1951, c. 303, § 3, p. 996;

Laws 1953, c. 335, § 2, p. 1100;

Laws 1957, c. 365, § 10, p. 1237;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 53, p. 1283;

Laws 1957, c. 367, § 8, p. 1292;

Laws 1959, c. 425, § 3, p. 1428;

Laws 1961, c. 415, § 31, p. 1261;

Laws 1961, c. 416, § 11, p. 1269;

Laws 1963, c. 507, § 1, p. 1614;

Laws 1963, c. 503, § 2, p. 1607;

Laws 1963, c. 505, § 1, p. 1612;

Laws 1963, c. 504, § 3, p. 1610;

Laws 1965, c. 543, § 1, p. 1730.

Commissioner of Labor, additional salary, see section 48-605.

Salaries of executive officers were fixed by Legislature and could not be increased during term. State ex rel. Laughlin v. Johnson, 156 Neb. 671, 57 N.W.2d 531 (1953).

Authority is vested in Governor to establish salaries for all persons connected with executive departments, including the heads thereof. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).

Attempt to reduce salaries of department heads was invalid because act failed to amend this section. State ex rel. Day v. Hall, 129 Neb. 699, 262 N.W. 850 (1935); State ex rel. Taylor v. Hall, 129 Neb. 669, 262 N.W. 835 (1935).